Utah statutes.
7-3-39.   Shareholders' right to examine bank records -- Records as to a particular customer.

Every shareholder of a bank shall have the right to examine the books and records of the bank as provided in Sections 16-10a-1601 through 16-10a-1604.  Access to records pertaining solely to the deposits, borrowings, or other financial transaction of a particular customer shall be allowed to a shareholder of the bank upon the following conditions:

(1)  a written request for such access is submitted to the board of directors of the bank stating its purpose and necessity;

(2)  the board denies such request;

(3)  the shareholder files a petition with a court of competent jurisdiction requesting an order granting such access;

(4)  after hearing upon not less than 10 days' written notice to the bank and to the particular person whose records are involved, the court finds that the request for access is made in good faith and it is necessary to protect a legitimate interest of a shareholder;

(5)  the court orders that the records of the bank pertaining to the particular customer be made available subject to such conditions as the court considers appropriate to protect the privacy of the customer; and

(6)  the person seeking to inspect or obtain copies of such records reimburses the bank for the costs of search, retrieval, and reproduction of such records.  The bank shall have no liability to the customer in providing to the shareholder of the bank access to such records in accordance with the terms and conditions of the order of the court.

